Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.650

Remedies of department as to stations.

When a station is licensed pursuant to this chapter, the department may assert any and all the remedies provided for in this chapter, including but not limited to those remedies provided for in RCW 22.09.350. Furthermore, if inspection of that portion of the station located in the contiguous state is refused by the licensee, the department may give notice to the licensee to submit to such inspection as the department may deem necessary.

If the station refuses to comply with the terms of the notice within twenty-four hours, the director may summarily suspend the station's license pending a hearing in compliance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1983 c 305 s 63; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 26.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.